Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3805
Exercise of rights protected; retaliatory personnel action prohibited.

(1) It shall be unlawful for an employer or any other person to interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, any right protected under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act.

(2) An employer shall not take retaliatory personnel action against an employee or former employee because the person has exercised or attempted to exercise rights protected under the act. Such rights include, but are not limited to, the right to request or use paid sick time pursuant to the act; the right to file a suit or complaint or inform any person about any employer's alleged violation of the act; the right to participate in an investigation, hearing, or proceeding or cooperate with or assist the department in its investigations of alleged violations of the act; and the right to inform any person of the person's potential rights under the act.

(3) It shall be unlawful for an employer's absence control policy to count paid sick time taken under the act as an absence that may lead to or result in a retaliatory personnel action or any other adverse action.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 5.